src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
! patsas:patsa
LEXICON N-patsas
+N+Der/tOin:%>V2%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-patsas_01 ;

LEXICON N-patsas_01
+Sg+Nom:%>%^WCnss      K                ;
:%>V2	       SG-GEN           ;
:h%>V2	       SG-GEN           ;
:%>%^WCnss	       SG-PAR_tA 	;
:%>V2      SG-ILL_sse		;
:h%>V2      SG-ILL_sse		;
:%>V2      SG-INE		;
:h%>V2      SG-INE		;
:%>V2      SG-ELA		;
:h%>V2      SG-ELA		;
:%>V2      SG-ALL		;
:h%>V2      SG-ALL		;
:%>V2      SG-ADE		;
:h%>V2      SG-ADE		;
:%>V2      SG-ABL		;
:h%>V2      SG-ABL		;
:%>V2      SG-TRA		;
:h%>V2      SG-TRA		;
:h%>%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ESS_Vn		;
:%>V2      SG-ESS_nnA		;
:%>V2      SG-EXE		;
:h%>%^LCns%>V2      SG-EXE		;
:%>V2      SG-COM		;
:%>V2      PL-NOM		;
:h%>V2      PL-NOM		;
:%>V2      PL-GEN		;
:h%>%^LCnsi      PL-GEN		;
:%>V2      PL-PAR_tA		;
:h%>%^LCns      PL-PAR_A		;
:%>V2      PL-ILL_sse		;
:h      PL-ILL_sse		;

:%>V2      PL-INE		;
:hi      PL-INE		;
:%>V2      PL-ELA		;
:%>hi      PL-ELA		;
:%>V2      PL-ALL		;
:h      PL-ALL		;
:%>V2      PL-ADE		;
:hi      PL-ADE		;
:%>V2      PL-ABL		;
:h      PL-ABL		;
:%>V2      PL-TRA		;
:h      PL-TRA		;
:%>V2      PL-ESS_Vn		;
:h%>%^LCnsi      PL-ESS_Vn		;
:%>V2      PL-ESS_nnA		;
:h%>%^LCns      PL-EXE		;
:      PL-EXE		;


! lähe:lähte
LEXICON N-lähe
+N+Der/tOin:t A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-lähe_01 ;
+N+Sg+Nom:%>%^WCns      K                ;

LEXICON N-lähe_01
:%>%^LCnsV2	       SG-GEN           ;
:h%>V2	       SG-GEN           ;
:%>%^WCnst       SG-PAR_tA 	;
+Sg+Par:%>%^WCnsttAÄ1 K ;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ILL_sse		;
:h%>V2      SG-ILL_sse		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-INE		;
:h%>V2      SG-INE		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ELA		;
:h%>V2      SG-ELA		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ALL		;
:h%>V2      SG-ALL		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ADE		;
:h%>V2      SG-ADE		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ABL		;
:h%>V2      SG-ABL		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-TRA		;
:h%>V2      SG-TRA		;
:h%>%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ESS_Vn		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-ESS_nnA		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      SG-EXE		;
:h%>%^LCns%>V2      SG-EXE		;
:%>%^LCnsV2      PL-NOM		;
:h%>V2      PL-NOM		;
:%>%^LCns Oblique-Plural_sse ;
:h Oblique-Plural_sse ;
!! Check 2012-10-12
:      PL-PAR_tA		;
:h%>%^LCns      PL-PAR_A		;
:h%>%^LCnsi      PL-ESS_Vn		;





! from mato (II-e)
LEXICON N-slovari
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; ! slovaritoin
+N: N-slovari_01 ;

LEXICON N-slovari_01
 SG-NOM   ; ! slovari
 SG-GEN   ; ! slovarin
+Sg+Par:%>AÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:%>%^LVws	#   ; ! mattoo
 SG-INE   ; ! maooz
+Sg+Ela:%>st    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:%>lle    #   ; ! maolle
 SG-ADE   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:%>lt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:%>ks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:%>%^LVwsn    #   ; ! mattoon
 SG-ESS_nnA ;
+Sg+Exe:%>%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoont
+Sg+Com:%>nkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
: lOi-Pl ;
+Pl+Nom:%>t     #   ; ! maot
+Pl+Acc:%>t     #   ; ! maot



! the stem-final "a" is added here
! vokala (IV-b)
LEXICON N-vokala
+N+Der/tOin:a%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; ! vokalatoin
+N: N-vokala_01 ;

LEXICON N-vokala_01
:a     SG-NOM   ; ! vokala
:a SG-GEN ; ! jalan
:a SG-PAR_A   ; ! jalkaa
:a SG-ILL_V   ; ! jalkaa
:a SG-INE   ; ! nominativaas
:a SG-ELA   ; ! jalast
:a SG-ALL   ; ! jalalle
:a SG-ADE   ; ! jalaal
:a SG-ABL  ; ! jalalt
:a SG-TRA   ; ! jalaks
:a SG-ESS_Vn   ; ! jalkaan
:a SG-ESS_nnA   ; ! vokalanna
:a SG-EXE   ; ! inƶenerant
:a SG-COM   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:a PL-NOM   ; ! vokalat
:o PL-GEN   ; ! jalkoin
:o PL-PAR_A   ; ! vokaloja
:o PL-PAR_tA   ; ! praaviloita
:o PL-ILL_hV   ; ! jalkoihe
:o PL-INE   ; ! jalois
:o PL-ELA   ; ! jaloist
:o PL-ALL   ; ! jaloille
:o PL-ADE   ; ! jaloil
:o PL-ABL   ; ! jaloilt
:o PL-TRA   ; ! jaloiks
:o PL-ESS_nnA   ; ! jalkoin
:o PL-EXE   ; ! jalkoin
:o PL-COM   ; ! vokaloinka
:o PL-INS   ; ! vokaloinee

! harakka:harakk
! This should operate using principles of ommeena
LEXICON N-harakka
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !harakatoin
+N: N-harakka_01 ;

LEXICON N-harakka_01
+Sg+Nom:AÄ1     #   ; ! harakka
+Sg+Gen:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2%>%^WCnsn	#   ; ! harraakan
+Sg+Par:AÄ1AÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:AÄ1%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
+Sg+Ine:AÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1s    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ine:AÄ1%>%^WCnss    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ela:AÄ1%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:AÄ1%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! maolle
+Sg+Ade:AÄ1%>%^WCnsl    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Ade:AÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1l    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:AÄ1%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:AÄ1%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:AÄ1%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:AÄ1%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:AÄ1%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:OÖ1  Oblique-Plural_hV ;
:OÖ1 PL-PAR_A ;
+Pl+Nom:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2%^WCnst     #   ; ! maot

LEXICON N-ommeena
+N+Der/tOin:AÄ1%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !omenatoin
+N: N-ommeena_01 ;

LEXICON N-ommeena_01
+Sg+Nom:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2     #   ; ! mato
+Sg+Gen:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2n	#   ; ! maon
+Sg+Par:AÄ1AÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:AÄ1%>%^LCnsV1	#   ; ! mattoo
+Sg+Ine:AÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1s    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ine:AÄ1%>%^WCnss    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ela:AÄ1%>%^WCnsst    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:AÄ1%>%^WCnslle    #   ; ! maolle
+Sg+Ade:AÄ1%>%^WCnsl    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Ade:AÄ1%>%^WCnsAÄ1l    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:AÄ1%>%^WCnslt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:AÄ1%>%^WCnsks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:AÄ1%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:AÄ1%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:AÄ1%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:OÖ1 Oblique-Plural_hV ;
:OÖ1 PL-PAR_A ;
:OÖ1 PL-PAR_tA ;
:AÄ1%^StretchSyll2 PL-NOM   ; ! maot

! putteeli:puteli
! 
LEXICON N-putteeli
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !putelitoin
+N: N-putteeli_01 ;

LEXICON N-putteeli_01
+Sg+Nom:%^StretchSyll2     #   ; ! mato
+Sg+Gen:%^StretchSyll2n	#   ; ! maon
+Sg+Par:AÄ1	#   ; ! mattooa
+Sg+Ill:i	#   ; ! mattoo
+Sg+Ine:%^StretchSyll2is    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ine:%^StretchSyll2s    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ela:%^StretchSyll2st    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:%^StretchSyll2lle    #   ; ! maolle
+Sg+Ade:%^StretchSyll2l    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:%^StretchSyll2lt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:%^StretchSyll2ks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:%>%^LCns%^LVwsnnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:%>%^LCns%^LVwsnt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:%>%^WCnsnkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
:%^StretchSyll2  lOi-Pl ; ! putteeliloin
+Pl+Nom:%^StretchSyll2t     #   ; ! maot


! leikkuu, kiukkaa, lämmää (VI)
LEXICON N-leikkuu
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; ! leikkuutoin
+N: N-leikkuu_01 ;

LEXICON N-leikkuu_01
+Sg+Nom:0     #   ; ! mato
+Sg+Gen:%>n	#   ; ! maon
+Sg+Par:%>tAÄ1	#   ; ! ?lämmäätä vs 
+Sg+Ill:%>sse	#   ; ! mattoo
+Sg+Ine:%>s    #   ; ! maoos
+Sg+Ela:%>st    #   ; ! maost
+Sg+All:%>lle    #   ; ! maolle
+Sg+Ade:%>l    #   ; ! maool
+Sg+Abl:%>lt    #   ; ! maolt
+Sg+Tra:%>ks    #   ; ! maoks
+Sg+Ess:%>nnAÄ1    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Exe:%>nt    #   ; ! mattoon
+Sg+Com:%>nkAÄ1    #   ; ! maanka
! Plural
 lOi-Pl ;
+Pl+Nom:%>t     #   ; ! maot

! assia:assi (VII)
LEXICON N-assia
+N+Der/tOin:AÄ1%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !
+N: N-assia_01 ;

LEXICON N-assia_01
:AÄ1 N-assia_01-Sg ;
:OÖ1  Oblique-Plural ;
:OÖ1 PL-PAR_A ;

LEXICON N-assia_01-Sg
 SG-NOM	    ; ! assia
 SG-GEN     ; ! maon
 SG-PAR_A   ; ! assiaa
 SG-ILL_V   ; ! assiaa
 SG-INE     ; ! assias
:AÄ1 SG-INE ; ! assiaas
 SG-ELA     ; ! assiast
 SG-ALL     ; ! assialle
:AÄ1 SG-ADE ; ! assiaal
 SG-ADE     ; ! assial
 SG-ABL     ; ! assialt
 SG-TRA	    ; ! assiaks
 SG-ESS_nnA ; ! assianna
 SG-EXE	    ; ! assiant
 SG-COM     ; ! assianka
! Plural
:%>%^WCns PL-NOM  ; ! assiat

! tähkä (VIII)
LEXICON N-tähkä
+N+Der/tOin:%>%^WCnst A-kalatoin ; !tähätöin
+N: N-tähkä_01 ;
