src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
lähe:lähte N-lähe  "" ;
pere:pere N-lähe  "" ;
tae:take N-lähe  "" ;
mae:make N-lähe  "" ;
kuve:kupe N-lähe  "" ;
rae:rake N-lähe  "" ;
sae:sake N-lähe  "" ;
hoone:hoone N-lähe  "" ;
hyle:hylke N-lähe  "" ;
assia:assi N-assia  "" ;
patsas:patsa N-patsas  "" ;
veeras:veera N-patsas  "" ;
lammas:lampa N-patsas  "" ;
hammas:hampa N-patsas  "" ;
kerves:kerve N-patsas  "" ;
tanvas:tanva N-patsas  "" ;
seiväs:seivä N-patsas  "" ;
kangas:kanga N-patsas  "" ;
taivas:taiva N-patsas  "" ;
nagris:nagri N-patsas  "" ;
prepositsia:prepositsi N-vokala  "" ;
tarelka:tarelk N-vokala  "" ;
porjatka:porjatk N-vokala  "" ;
orkestra:orkestr N-vokala  "" ;
kvantitetta:kvantitett N-vokala  "" ;
kanava:kanav N-vokala  "" ;
brigadira:brigadir N-vokala  "" ;
praaznikka:praaznikk N-vokala  "" ;
zapasa:zapas N-vokala  "" ;
vokalagarmonia:vokala#garmoni N-vokala  "" ;
tööprotsessia:töö#protsessi N-vokala  "" ;
traktorista:traktorist N-vokala  "" ;
superlativa:superlativ N-vokala  "" ;
stihotvorenja:stihotvorenj N-vokala  "" ;
sobranja:sobranja N-vokala  "" ;
seemecka:seemeck N-vokala  "" ;
rьbakka:rьbakk N-vokala  "" ;
rauhanpolitikka:rauhan#politikk N-vokala  "" ;
prostranstva:prostranstv N-vokala  "" ;
predstavlenja:predstavlenj N-vokala  "" ;
praktikka:praktikk N-vokala  "" ;
politikka:politikk N-vokala  "" ;
peenennyssuffiksa:peenennys#suffiks N-vokala  "" ;
osasubjekta:osa#subjekt N-vokala  "" ;
naznacenja:naznacenj N-vokala  "" ;
elementta:elementt N-vokala  "" ;
bibliotekka:bibliotekk N-vokala  "" ;
barabana:baraban N-vokala  "" ;
maşina:maşin N-vokala  "" ;
komparativa:komparativ N-vokala  "" ;
komandirovka:komandirovk N-vokala  "" ;
instruktiva:instruktiv N-vokala  "" ;
hattula:hattul N-vokala  "" ;
georgina:georgin N-vokala  "" ;
preesens:preesensi N-slovari  "" ;
imperfekta:imperfekt N-vokala  "" ;
indikativa:indikativ N-vokala  "" ;
partisippa:partisipp N-vokala  "" ;
tehnikka:tehnikk N-vokala  "" ;
funktsia:funktsi N-vokala  "" ;
painutostablitsa:painutos#tablits N-vokala  "" ;
sojuza:sojuz N-vokala  "" ;
proizvodstva:proizvodstv N-vokala  "" ;
struktura:struktur N-vokala  "" ;
sisteema:sisteem N-vokala  "" ;
olopadeƶa:olo#padeƶ N-vokala  "" ;
eropadeƶa:ero#padeƶ N-vokala  "" ;
otnoşenja:otnoşenj N-vokala  "" ;
infinitiva:infinitiv N-vokala  "" ;
essiiva:essiiv N-vokala  "" ;
elativa:elativ N-vokala  "" ;
kulttuura:kulttuur N-vokala  "" ;
avtora:avtor N-vokala  "" ;
praavila:praavil N-vokala  "" ;
ommeena:omen N-ommeena  "" ;
sattuula:satul N-ommeena  "" ;
kammeela:kamel N-ommeena  "" ;
porroona:poron N-ommeena  "" ;
vassaara:vasar N-ommeena  "" ;
hammaara:hamar N-ommeena  "" ;
hummaala:humal N-ommeena  "" ;
pettääja:petäj N-ommeena  "" ;
kattaaja:kataj N-ommeena  "" ;
jallaava:jalav N-ommeena  "" ;
orraava:orav N-ommeena  "" ;
tavvaara:tavar N-ommeena  "" ;
pittääjä:pittäj N-ommeena  "" ;
ahhaava:ahav N-ommeena  "" ;
oppoosa:opos N-ommeena  "" ;
präkkiinä:präkin N-ommeena  "" ;
kuttooja:kutoj N-ommeena  "" ;
verrääjä:veräj N-ommeena  "" ;
kammaara:kamar N-ommeena  "" ;
appaaja:apaj N-ommeena  "" ;
sissaava:sisav N-ommeena  "" ;
kaijaava:kajav N-ommeena  "" ;
käppäälä:käpäl N-ommeena  "" ;
tekkiijä:tekij N-ommeena  "" ;
putteeli:puteli N-putteeli  "" ;
sinneeli:sineli N-putteeli  "" ;
pappeeri:paperi N-putteeli  "" ;
hämmääri:hämäri N-putteeli  "" ;
lyhe:lyhte N-lähe  "" ;
kiire:kiire N-lähe  "" ;
vene:vene N-lähe  "" ;
harakka:harakk N-harakka  "" ;
javlenja:javlenj N-vokala  "" ;
tähkä:tähkä N-tähkä  "" ;
härkä:härkä N-tähkä  "" ;
kesä:kesä N-tähkä  "" ;
pesä:pesä N-tähkä  "" ;
heinä:heinä N-tähkä  "" ;
reikä:reikä N-tähkä  "" ;
kenkä:kenkä N-tähkä  "" ;
lisä:lisä N-tähkä  "" ;
veljä:veljä N-tähkä  "" ;
päivä:päivä N-tähkä  "" ;
määrä:määrä N-tähkä  "" ;
seppä:seppä N-tähkä  "" ;
seinä:seinä N-tähkä  "" ;
pitkittymä:pitkittymä N-tähkä  "" ;
perä:perä N-tähkä  "" ;
terä:terä N-tähkä  "" ;
äijä:äijä N-tähkä  "" ;
kerä:kerä N-tähkä  "" ;
silmä:silmä N-tähkä  "" ;
lehmä:lehmä N-tähkä  "" ;
leipä:leipä N-tähkä  "" ;
leppä:leppä N-tähkä  "" ;
kylä:kylä N-tähkä  "" ;
rantakylä:ranta#kylä N-tähkä  "" ;
metsä:metsä N-tähkä  "" ;
steeppeni:steeppeni N-slovari  "" ;
rinnoitussteeppeni:rinnoitus#steeppeni N-slovari  "" ;
slovari:slovari N-slovari  "" ;
matrossi:matrossi N-slovari  "" ;
sekrettari:sekrettari N-slovari  "" ;
fonari:fonari N-slovari  "" ;
deistviteljnosti:deistviteljnosti N-slovari  "" ;
vozmoƶnosti:vozmoƶnosti N-slovari  "" ;
oblasti:oblasti N-slovari  "" ;
selsovetti:selsovetti N-slovari  "" ;
motori:motori N-slovari  "" ;
adverbi:adverbi N-slovari  "" ;
naapuri:naapuri N-slovari  "" ;
